District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Housing Capacity Preservation Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 7 of the Historic Landmark and Historic District Protection Act of 1978,
effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-144; D.C. Official Code § 6-1101 et seq.) is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 3(4) (D.C. Official Code § 6-1102(4)) is amended by striking the phrase
“height,”.
Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 6-1107) is amended by adding a new subsection (g) to
read as follows:


“(g) A finding of incompatibility pursuant to subsection (f) of this section shall not be
based on a finding that would necessitate a reduction of the floor area ratio, residential square
footage, or dwelling unit density, as those terms are defined in 11 DCMR § B100 et seq., below
what is permitted matter-of-right in the zone district of the subject property, or the floor area
ratio or dwelling unit density granted by the Zoning Commission or Board of Zoning
Adjustment.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.